Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 5. Dissolution.

Sec. 10.15.460.
Voluntary dissolution by act of cooperative.

A cooperative may be dissolved by the act of the cooperative, when authorized in the manner set out in this section.

The board shall adopt a resolution directing the question of dissolution to be submitted to a vote at an annual or special meeting of members.

Written notice shall be given to each member in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members, and must state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the advisability of dissolving the cooperative.

At the meeting a vote of members shall be taken on a resolution to dissolve the cooperative. The resolution is adopted if it receives the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the member votes cast. The articles may permit shareholders to vote on a resolution for dissolution, and may fix the proportion of authorized shareholder votes required for adoption.

History.

(§ 50(1) — (3) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory clause was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) — (3) were redesignated as subsections (b) — (d) respectively.

Collateral references. —

19 C.J.S., Corporations, § 914 et seq.

Sec. 10.15.465.
Execution and content of statement of intent to dissolve.

Upon the adoption of the resolution, a statement of intent to dissolve shall be executed in duplicate by the cooperative by its president or a vice-president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary and must set out

the name of the cooperative;

the names and addresses of its officers;

the names and addresses of its directors;

a copy of the resolution adopted authorizing the dissolution of the cooperative;

the date of the adoption of the resolution;

the number of member votes for and against the resolution;

if shareholders were authorized to vote on the resolution, the total number of authorized shareholder votes, the number of votes cast for and against the resolution, and the number of votes required by the articles for adoption.

History.

(§ 50(4) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 24 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.15.470.
Filing statement of intent to dissolve.

Duplicate originals of the statement of intent to dissolve shall be filed and handled by the department in the manner provided in AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) with respect to business corporations.

The filing of a statement of intent to dissolve has the same effect as to the cooperative as is provided in AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) for business corporations.

History.

(§ 51 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporation Act (AS 10.05)” to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Sec. 10.15.475.
Procedure after filing of statement of intent to dissolve.

After the filing by the department of a statement of intent to dissolve

the cooperative shall proceed to collect its assets, convey and dispose of the property not to be distributed in kind to its members or shareholders, pay, satisfy and discharge its liabilities and obligations and do all other acts required to liquidate its business and affairs, and, after paying or adequately providing for the payment of all its obligations, distribute the remainder of its assets, either in cash or in kind, among the persons entitled to them by law, the articles and the bylaws;

the cooperative, at any time during the liquidation of its business and affairs, may apply to a court within the state and judicial district in which the registered office or principal place of business of the cooperative is situated to have the liquidation continued under the supervision of the court as provided in this chapter;

any cooperative which has filed a statement of intent to dissolve that does not, within two years from the date of filing, carry the dissolution to a conclusion shall be involuntarily dissolved as provided in AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code).

History.

(§ 52 ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 24 ch 170 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporation Act (AS 10.05)” in paragraph (3) to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Sec. 10.15.480.
Revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings by act of cooperative.

A cooperative, at any time prior to the issuance of a certificate of dissolution by the department, may revoke a voluntary dissolution proceeding by adoption of a resolution of revocation in the same manner and by the same vote of members and shareholders required by this chapter for adoption of a resolution to dissolve.

History.

(§ 53 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.485.
Execution and content of statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings.

Upon the adoption of the resolution of revocation, a statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be executed in duplicate by the cooperative by its president or a vice-president and its secretary or an assistant secretary and must set out a copy of the adopted resolution and other pertinent information as required by AS

10.15.460

and

10.15.465

to be set out in a statement of intent to dissolve.

History.

(§ 53(2) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 25 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.15.490.
Filing statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings.

Duplicate originals of the statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be handled by the department in the same manner as provided by this chapter for filing of a statement of intent to dissolve.

Upon the filing by the department of the statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings, a revocation of the voluntary dissolution proceedings is effective and the cooperative may again carry on its business.

History.

(§ 54 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.495.
Articles of dissolution.

If voluntary dissolution proceedings have not been revoked, when all debts, liabilities, and obligations of the cooperative have been paid and discharged, or adequate provision has been made for their payment and discharge, and all of the remaining property and assets of the cooperative have been distributed to the persons entitled to them, articles of dissolution shall be executed in duplicate by the cooperative by its president or a vice-president and its secretary or an assistant secretary. The articles of dissolution must set out

the name of the cooperative;

that the department has filed a statement of intent to dissolve the cooperative and the date on which the statement was filed;

that all the property and assets of the cooperative remaining after payment or discharge, or adequate provision for payment or discharge of all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the cooperative, have been distributed to the persons entitled to them in accordance with their rights and interests;

that there are no suits pending against the cooperative in any court, or that adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of any judgment, order, or decree that may be entered against it in a pending suit.

History.

(§ 55 ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 26 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.15.500.
Filing articles of dissolution and issuance of certificate of dissolution.

Duplicate originals of the articles of dissolution shall be filed and a certificate of dissolution shall be issued as provided in AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code).

The certificate of dissolution together with the duplicate original of the articles of dissolution affixed to it by the department shall be returned to the representative of the dissolved cooperative. Upon the issuance of the certificate of dissolution the existence of the cooperative ceases, except for the purpose of suits, other proceedings and appropriate corporate action by members, shareholders, directors and officers as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 56 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporation Act (AS 10.05)” in subsection (a) to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Sec. 10.15.505.
Involuntary dissolution and cancellation of corporate filings.

The provisions in AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) relating to involuntary dissolution of business corporations and to the cancellation of certain corporate filings apply to cooperatives.

History.

(§ 57 ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 48 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporation Act (AS 10.05)” to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For involuntary dissolution, see AS

10.06.628

—

10.06.650

; for provisions relating to cancellation of certificates and filings, see AS

10.06.865

.

Sec. 10.15.510.
Jurisdiction of court to liquidate assets and business of cooperative.

In addition to any other instances in which the law provides the power, a court may liquidate the assets and business of a cooperative

in an action by a member or shareholder when it is established that the members are deadlocked in voting power, and have failed, for a period which includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election of their successors; or the corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted;

in an action by a creditor when the claim of the creditor has been reduced to judgment and an execution has been returned unsatisfied and it is established that the cooperative is insolvent; or when the cooperative has admitted in writing that the claim of the creditor is due and owing and it is established that the cooperative is insolvent;

upon application by a cooperative which has filed a statement of intent to dissolve as provided in this chapter to have its liquidation continued under the supervision of the court;

when an action has been filed by the attorney general to dissolve a cooperative and it is established that liquidation of its business and affairs should precede the entry of a decree of dissolution.

History.

(§ 58(1) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.515.
Joinder of members or shareholders unnecessary.

It is not necessary to make members or shareholders parties to an action or proceeding under AS

10.15.510

unless relief is sought against them personally.

History.

(§ 58(3) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.520.
Deposit with department of amount due persons who cannot be found; unknown persons, or incompetent persons.

Upon the voluntary or involuntary dissolution of a cooperative, the portion of the assets distributable to a creditor, member, shareholder, or patron or other person unknown or who cannot be found, or who is under a disability with no person legally competent to receive the distributive portion, shall be reduced to cash and, within six months after the final dividend in the liquidation or winding up is payable, shall be deposited with the department. The receiver or other liquidating agent shall prepare in duplicate a statement containing the names and last known addresses of the persons entitled to the funds and shall file the statement with the department. The department shall handle the funds in accordance with AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

History.

(§ 59 ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 27 ch 65 SLA 1998)